California, session 20252026, SB1382.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 95.5 of the Streets and Highways Code is amended to read:95.5. (a) The department shall remove snow from that portion of former U.S. Route 40, which has been superseded by the relocation and construction of Interstate Route 80, commencing at its intersection with Interstate Route 80 near Donner Memorial Park westerly approximately four miles to the vicinity of Donner Lake.(b)The department shall ensure that all mountain passes under its control are open for operation by May 1 of each year. If it is projected that it is not feasible for the department to meet this requirement, the department shall publish on its internet website a written notice of which mountain passes it will not be able to open, including the documented causes, by April 1 of each year.(b) (1) On or before April 1 of each year, the department shall, to the extent feasible, notify an affected local official of the department’s proposed schedule for opening a mountain pass.(2) The department shall develop a public outreach plan to inform the public about the closing and opening of a mountain pass. The public outreach plan shall include, but not be limited to, publishing that information on its internet website.(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “mountain pass” means a state highway that has a physical gate that is used to close the state highway to through traffic during winter months or an emergency.